District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.24

Criminal and civil penalties.

(a)

Any person or entity who violates any provision of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed 180 days, a fine not to exceed $1,000, or both. Each unlawful act shall constitute a separate violation.

(b)

Any person or entity who has been previously convicted pursuant to this chapter shall, upon conviction for a subsequent violation, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed one year, a fine not to exceed $5,000, or both.

(c)

Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any violations of the provisions of this chapter or of rules promulgated under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.]. The adjudication of any infraction shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to Chapter 18A of Title 2 [§ 2-1831.01 et seq.], Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.], and rules promulgated pursuant to those chapters.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 25, 56 DCR 1167
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 56(b), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171, in (c), deleted a comma following “Hearings” and substituted “pursuant to Chapter 18A of Title 2, Chapter 18 of Title 2, and rules promulgated” for “pursuant to Chapter 18A of Title 2, and to Chapter 18 of Title 2, and to rules promulgated” in the second sentence.